src/phonology/nob-phon.twolc
!! !!!MorpAhophonological rules for Bokmål

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð
 '
 o:ø u:y a:e g:0 e:0 m:0 r:0 t:0 u:0
 l7:l ! This one not deleted by t

 t:d
 0:t
! 0:d
 s:'

! Morpheme boundaries and escaped quotes - leave as is,
! they will be converted to zero/the real thing at a later stage.
 %#
 %>
 %<
 %|»
 «%|
 «7
 »7
 %[%<%]
 %[%>%]

 X1:0 X2:0 X3:0 X4:0 X5:0 X6:0 X7:0 X8:0 X9:0
 Q1:0 Q2:0 Q3:0 Q4:0 Q5:0 Q6:0 Q7:0 Q8:0 Q9:0
 Y1:0 Y2:0 Y3:0 Y4:0 Y5:0 Y6:0 Y7:0 Y8:0 Y9:0 
 Z1:0 Z2:0 Z3:0 Z4:0 Z5:0 Z6:0 Z7:0 Z8:0 Z9:0 

%^NYNAG:0 ;

! the chapter "Rule-variables" must under the M4 regime:
! To be removed when compiling on Xerox twolc:

!htwolc Rule-variables

        ! All rule-variables, that are used, should be declared.
        ! If this isn't done, annoying warning-messages will be
        ! issued (otherwise the grammar is constructed as it
        ! should be)

!htwolc        Cx Cy Cz Vx Vy ;

Sets
 Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å ;
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ;
 LNR = l n r ;
 Dummy = X1 X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 X9 %^NYNAG
 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 Q5 Q6 Q7 Q8 Q9
 Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y8 Y9 
 Z1 Z2 Z3 Z4 Z5 Z6 Z7 Z8 Z9 ;  ! %+ 

! Use of diacritics
! Q  = Verbal rules
! Q1 = Passive
! Q3 = Verb vowel and geminate deltion kalte, fylte
! X  = Nominal rules
! X1 = Epenthetic vowel moden:modne
! X3 = Plural r deletion -er, -ene
! X4 = dumm:dum Delete m
! X5 = um deletion, faktum:fakta
! X6 = t:d weakening, oppskjørtet:oppskjørtede
! Z  = Common rules
! Z1 = o:ø, a:e Umlaut
! Z2 = protects vowel


!! !!!Rule section

Rules



!! Nynorsk dictionary rules

"Change -er stem to -ar in Nynorsk"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 e:a <=> _ r %^NYNAG: ;

!! This rule is for dictionary use only.

!!€ lærer%^NYNAG
!!€ lærar0

 

! Epenthetic deletions
! --------------------

"e Deletion"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 e:0 <=>          Cns: _ LNR X1: %>: ( e | a ) ;
         Vow ( Cns:* ) _ ( Dummy:* - Z2: ) %>:0 [ Vow | Cns Cns ] ;
		       _ [%>:0 Q3:|Q3: X4:] ;
             i g %>:0  _ s t ;

!!€ teaterX1>et
!!€ teat0r00et

!!€ modenX1>e
!!€ mod0n00e

!!€ reparere>Q3te
!!€ reparer000te

!!$ modenX1>e
!!$ moden00e

!!€ hare>er
!!€ har00er

!!€ viktig>est
!!€ viktig00st

"Consonant shortening before deletion"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 Cx:0 <=> Vow Cx _ e: LNR X1: %>: ( e | a ) ;
          where Cx in ( b d v ) ;

!!€ sikkerX1>e
!!€ sik00r00e


"Geminate deletion in front of -t and -d"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 Cx:0 <=> Vow Cx _ (e:0)         %>: Q3: [d|t] ; ! kaller:kalte
          Vow Cx _ :t e s  Q1:  ; ! lykkes:lyktes
          Vow Cx _  e:   LNR X1: %>: ( e | a ) ;  ! sikker:sikre
      where Cx in ( f k p s l n g ) ;

!!€ kalle>Q3te
!!€ kal0000te

!!€ lykk0esQ1
!!€ lyk0tes0

!!€ all>Q3t
!!€ al000t

!!€ bygge>Q3de
!!€ byg0000de



!"Delete schwaa" ! h a r e:0 %> e r
! e:0 <=> Vow ( Cns:* ) _ ( Dummy:* - Z2: ) %>:0 [ Vow | Cns Cns ] ;

"Delete foreign vowel"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 Vx:0 <=> _ X2:  ;
	where Vx in (a o) ;

!!€ kollegaX2>er
!!€ kolleg000er


"Delete r"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 r:0 <=>   _ %>:0 X3: ;
         r _ e: LNR X1: %>: ( e | a ) ;
! sparepengar : sparepengane

"Delete m"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 m:0 <=>    _ X4: [ #: (Q3:) | %>:0 s ] ;      ! kammX4:kam
          m _ e: LNR X1: %>: ( e | a ) ; ! gammel:gamle
          m _ e: %>:0 Q3: t ;
         u: _ X5: %>:0 ;
         

"Umlaut"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:* ( e:0 ) Z1: ;
 where Vx in ( u o a )
       Vy in ( y ø e )
       matched ;
! bok : bøker

!"m deletion"
! m:0 <=> Vow: _ m #: ;


"um Deletion 1"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 u:0 <=> _ m: X5: %>:0 ;

!!€ museumX5>er
!!€ muse0000er

!"um Deletion 2" ! now m rule
! m:0 <=> u: _ X5: %>:0 ;


"t weakening"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 t:d <=> [Cns:|Vow:] _ X6:0 %>:0 e ;

!!€ oppskjørtetX6>e
!!€ oppskjørted00e
 



"Double t deletion"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 t:0 <=> t: %>:   _ .#. ;
           Vow t _  e:   LNR X1: %>: ( e | a ) ;  ! sikker:sikre
           Vow t _ (e:0)         %>: Q3:0 [d|t] ; ! kaller:kalte

!!€ svart>t
!!€ svart00

!" inf-e"
! e:0 <=> _ %>:0 Q3: ;

!!€ presentere%>Q3t
!!€ presenter000t

! Insertion rules
! ---------------

"Insert t in passives"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 0:t <=> _ e s Q1: ;

!"Insert d in passives"
! 0:d <=> _ e s Q1: ;

! Clitics
! -------

"Clitic after s-final"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 s:' <=> s %>:0 _ ;
! huss -> hus'

! Test to have an error
!!$ a
!!$ b
